Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.062

State convention and trade center employees—Travel expenses.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, employees of the corporation formed under *RCW 67.40.020 shall be reimbursed for actual and reasonable travel and subsistence expenses incurred out of state for the purpose of marketing the convention center as may be requested or performed by the chief executive officer of the corporation subject to approval of the office of financial management. Reimbursement under this section may not be for promotional hosting expenditures.

[ 1985 c 233 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 67.40.020 was repealed by 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 15, effective December 30, 2010.